Washington statutes.
RCW 14.12.180

Administration of airport zoning regulations.

All airport zoning regulations adopted under this chapter shall provide for the administration and enforcement of such regulations by an administrative agency which may be an agency created by such regulations or any official, board, or other existing agency of the political subdivision adopting the regulations or of one of the political subdivisions which participated in the creation of the joint airport zoning board adopting the regulations, if satisfactory to that political subdivision, but in no case shall such administrative agency be or include any member of the board of adjustment. The duties of any administrative agency designated pursuant to this chapter shall include that of hearing and deciding all permits under RCW 14.12.110(1), but such agency shall not have or exercise any of the powers herein delegated to the board of adjustment.

[ 1945 c 174 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-23.]